Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Accident Report; Suspension of License and Registrations Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 ALR4th 907.

Instructions on “unavoidable accident,” “mere accident,” or the like, in motor vehicle cases—modern cases, 21 ALR5th 82.

§ 31-9-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 173, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 4, concerned the reporting of accidents by drivers or owners of vehicles.

§ 31-9-202.
Suspension of license and registration after accident report; exclusions and security requirements.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of an investigating officer’s report of a motor vehicle accident within this state as required under W.S.

31-5-1106

through

31-5-1108

or after a demand for additional security under W.S. 31-9-207(b), the division shall with respect to each driver and motor vehicle involved in the accident, and except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, suspend:

The Wyoming driver’s license of each driver of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state;

All Wyoming registrations of each owner whose motor vehicle is required to be registered in this state;

The nonresident driving privilege of each driver of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state; and

The nonresident driving privilege of each owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state.

The suspension in subsection (a) of this section shall be imposed unless the driver, the owner or both file proof of financial responsibility.

This section does not apply to:

An owner if the owner had in effect at the time of the accident an automobile liability policy with respect to the motor vehicle involved in the accident;

The driver, if not the owner of the motor vehicle, if there was in effect at the time of the accident an automobile liability policy or bond with respect to his operation of motor vehicles not owned by him;

The driver or owner whose liability for damages resulting from the accident is, in the judgment of the division, covered by any other form of liability insurance policy or surety bond;

Any person qualifying as a self-insurer under W.S.

31-9-414

; or

The owner or driver, if a personal surety bond is filed with the division in an amount required by the division under this act with at least two (2) individual sureties each owning real estate within the state, which real estate shall be scheduled in the bond to be approved by a judge of the district court.

No insurance policy or surety bond is effective under this section unless issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized to do business in this state, except that if the motor vehicle was not registered in this state, or was a motor vehicle which was registered elsewhere than in this state at the effective date of the policy or bond, or the most recent renewal thereof, the policy or bond is not effective under this section unless the insurance company or surety company if not authorized to do business in this state executes a power of attorney authorizing the division to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action upon the policy or bond arising out of the accident. Every policy or bond shall be subject, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to the limit for one (1) person, to a limit of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and, if the accident has resulted in injury to or destruction of property, to a limit of not less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident.

Upon receipt of notice of the accident, the insurance company or surety company which issued the policy or bond shall furnish for filing with the division a written notice that the policy or bond was in effect at the time of the accident. This subsection does not apply to any person holding a motor carrier permit or certificate under W.S.

31-18-209

who furnishes proof of financial responsibility by filing a certificate of insurance under W.S. 31-9-402(a)(i) or a bond under W.S. 31-9-402(a)(ii) if the certificate or bond:

Is a continuing certificate or bond;

Remains in full force and effect until cancelled; and

May not be cancelled until notice in writing of the cancellation has been on file with the division for thirty (30) days.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 60-1505; Laws 1957, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-289; Laws 1961, ch. 165, § 2; 1971, ch. 69, § 4; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c)(v), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Insurer not required to file certificate of financial responsibility.—

Neither §

31-9-403

nor this section requires the insuring company to file a certificate of proof of financial responsibility. Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Appropriate for state to allow licensee to be own insurer.—

It is appropriate and reasonable for a state to require insurance or its equivalent as a condition for the issuance of a license, and it follows that it is all the more appropriate and reasonable for a state to allow a licensee to be his own insurer, upon the condition that he is prepared to show financial responsibility or the equivalent of insurance when the need therefor arises by reason of an accident in connection with which a judgment might be obtained against the licensee. And, of course, it is appropriate and reasonable for a license and registration to be suspended if the licensee fails to show such financial responsibility after an accident in connection with which a judgment might be obtained against him. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Division determines necessary security following accident,but not liability of owner. —

The superintendent (now division) is not called upon to determine whether there is liability on the part of an owner before he can suspend his registrations. He (It) does, however, determine what security shall be sufficient to satisfy any judgment which may be recovered against the owner, and this necessarily calls for the exercise of a discretion commensurate with the circumstances involved. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue v. Wilson, 401 P.2d 960,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1965).

Superintendent (now division) determines amount of security deposit upon basis of reports or other evidence

submitted to it. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

And, in so determining, must consider culpability. —

The superintendent (now division) cannot escape his (its) duty and responsibility under this section and §

31-9-207

to make a reasonable and proper determination of the amount of security that should be required to satisfy any judgment or judgments which might be recovered, and, in so determining, consider the matter of culpability. This determination is based upon an interpretation of the pertinent statutes, having in mind decisions in other jurisdictions dealing with motor vehicle safety-responsibility acts. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Division not obligated to deal with intricate legal problems.—

The superintendent (now division) does not have a duty, in determining the amount of security deposit, to make judgments based upon conflicting evidence and to deal with such legal problems as contributory negligence, the application of the last clear chance doctrine, and other intricate legal problems which can best be dealt with by the court. However, the superintendent (now division) should consider all of the facts presented to him (it) by way of accident reports, the reports of investigating officers, and other evidence submitted to him (it), and where that evidence would indicate that there is a lack of culpability on the part of the driver or drivers, the superintendent (now division) should not, under those conditions, suspend the operator's license or the automobile registration of the person or persons involved. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Parent's registrations may not be suspended for child's accident.—

Since a parent is not liable for the negligence of his child in driving his automobile, the superintendent (now division) is without authority to suspend the registrations of all motor vehicles owned by the parent until he posts security sufficient to satisfy any judgments arising from an accident caused by the child. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue v. Wilson, 400 P.2d 144,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 401 P.2d 960,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1965).

License suspension unlawful where driver not faulted, no injuries,and no damages claimed. —

The action of the superintendent (now division) in suspending a license on the basis of a reported accident is not lawful where the driver is not at fault in the accident, no personal injuries are involved, and the other driver does not want any money for the amount of property damage involved. Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1950).

Appeal from security amount governed by Administrative ProcedureAct. —

Any appeal from the determination of the amount of security to be deposited is governed by the Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16). Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969); Ulrich v. United Servs. Auto. Ass'n, 839 P.2d 942,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-9-203.
Exceptions to W.S. 31-9-202.

The requirements as to security and suspension in W.S.

31-9-202

shall not apply:

To the driver or the owner of a motor vehicle involved in an accident wherein no injury or damage was caused to the person or property of anyone other than the driver or owner;

To the driver or the owner of a motor vehicle legally parked at the time of the accident;

To the owner of a motor vehicle if at the time of the accident the vehicle was being driven without his permission, express or implied, or was parked by a person who had been driving the motor vehicle without permission;

If, prior to the date that the division would otherwise suspend license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege under W.S.

31-9-202

, there shall be filed with the division satisfactory evidence that the person who would otherwise have to file security has been released from liability or been finally adjudicated not to be liable or has executed a warrant for confession of judgment, payable in installments as the parties have agreed, or has executed a duly acknowledged written agreement providing for the payment of an agreed amount in installments, with respect to all claims for injuries or damages resulting from the accident.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 60-1506; W.S. 1957, § 31-290; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-9-204.
Reciprocal suspension of nonresidents' operating privileges and residents' licenses; notice to and from other states.

When a nonresident’s operating privilege is suspended pursuant to W.S.

31-9-202

, the division shall transmit a certified copy of the record of the action to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates in the state in which the nonresident resides, if the law of the other state provides for action in relation thereto similar to that provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

Upon receipt of certification that the driving privilege of a resident of this state has been suspended or revoked in any other state pursuant to a law providing for its suspension or revocation for failure to deposit security for the payment of judgments arising out of a motor vehicle accident, or for failure to deposit both security and proof of financial responsibility, under circumstances which would require the division to suspend a nonresident’s operating privilege had the accident occurred in this state, the division shall suspend the license of the resident and all of his registrations. Suspension shall continue until the resident furnishes evidence of his compliance with the law of the other state relating to the deposit of security and until the resident files proof of financial responsibility if required by the law.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-290.1; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-205.
Requirements for release of suspension.

The license and registration and nonresident’s operating privilege suspended as provided in W.S.

31-9-202

shall not be renewed nor shall any license or registration be issued to the person until:

The person deposits or there shall be deposited on his behalf the security required under W.S.

31-9-202

; or

One (1) year has elapsed following the date of the accident and satisfactory evidence has been filed with the division that during the period no action for damages arising out of the accident has been instituted; or

Satisfactory evidence has been filed with the division of a release from liability, a final adjudication of nonliability, a warrant for confession of judgment or an acknowledged written agreement, in accordance with W.S. 31-9-203(a)(iv). If there is any default in the payment of any installment under any confession of judgment, then, upon notice of default, the division shall suspend the license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege of the person defaulting which shall not be restored until the entire amount provided for in the confession of judgment is paid. If there is any default in the payment of any installment under any acknowledged written agreement, then, upon notice of default, the division shall forthwith suspend the license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege of the person defaulting which shall not be restored until:

The person deposits and thereafter maintains security as required under W.S. 31-9-202 in such amount as the division determines; or

One (1) year has elapsed following the date when the security was required and during the period no action upon the agreement was instituted in a court in this state.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 60-1507; W.S. 1957, § 31-291; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

§ 31-9-206.
Unlicensed driver or unregistered motor vehicle in accident.

If the driver or the owner of a motor vehicle involved in an accident within this state has no license or registration, he shall not be allowed a license or registration until he has complied with the requirements of W.S.

31-9-202

,

31-9-203

and

31-9-205

through

31-9-209

to the same extent that would be necessary if, at the time of the accident, he had held a license and registration.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 60-1508; W.S. 1957, § 31-292; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-207.
Form and amount of security; reduction or increase.

The security required under W.S.

31-9-202

,

31-9-203

and

31-9-205

through

31-9-209

shall be in such form and in such amount as the division may require but in no case in excess of the limits specified in W.S.

31-9-202

. The person depositing security shall specify in writing the person on whose behalf the deposit is made and, at any time while the deposit is in the custody of the division or state treasurer, the person depositing it may, in writing, amend the specification of the person or persons on whose behalf the deposit is made to include an additional person or persons. A single deposit of security is applicable only on behalf of persons required to furnish security because of the same accident.

The division may reduce or increase the amount of security ordered in any case within six (6) months after the date of the accident if, in its judgment, the amount ordered is excessive or insufficient. If the security originally ordered has been deposited the excess deposited over the reduced amount ordered shall be returned to the depositor or his personal representative forthwith, notwithstanding W.S.

31-9-208

.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 60-1609; W.S. 1957, § 31-293; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1.

Superintendent (now division) may grant a hearing, in his (its) discretion,

if and when a need therefor has been shown. This section authorizes the superintendent (now division) to reduce the amount of security after six months if he then considers the amount excessive. This helps to verify that the superintendent (now division) has a judgment and discretion to exercise at all times. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 31-9-208.
Disposition of security; judgments payable therefrom; return of balance.

Security deposited in compliance with the requirements of W.S.

31-9-202

,

31-9-203

and

31-9-205

through

31-9-209

shall be placed by the division in an account maintained for the purposes of this section and shall be applicable only to the payment of a judgment rendered against the person on whose behalf the deposit was made, for damages arising out of the accident in question in an action at law, begun not later than one (1) year after date of the accident, or within one (1) year after the date of deposit of any security under W.S.

31-9-205

(a)(iii), and any balance thereof shall be returned to the depositor or his personal representative when satisfactory evidence has been filed with the division that there has been a release from liability, a final adjudication of nonliability, a warrant for confession of judgment or an acknowledged agreement, in accordance with W.S.

31-9-203

(a)(iv), or whenever, after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the accident, or within one (1) year after the date of deposit of any security, W.S. 31-9-205(a)(iii), the division is given reasonable evidence that there is no action pending and no judgment rendered in any action left unpaid.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160,§ 10; C.S. 1945, § 60-1610; W.S. 1957, § 31-294; Laws 1985, ch. 234,§ 2; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “an account maintained for the purposes of this section” for “the custody of the state treasurer” near the beginning of the section.

§ 31-9-209.
Evidence of negligence.

Neither the reports required by W.S.

31-5-1106

through

31-5-1108

, the action taken by the division pursuant to W.S.

31-9-202

,

31-9-203

and

31-9-205

through

31-9-209

, the findings, if any, of the division upon which the action is based, nor the security filed as provided in W.S.

31-9-202

,

31-9-203

and

31-9-205

through

31-9-209

shall be any evidence of the negligence or due care of either party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 60-1611; W.S. 1957, § 31-295; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to confidentiality of accident reports, see §§

31-5-1110

and

31-5-1111

.

Application of statute. —

Testimony of driver's accident reconstruction expert was not violative of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-9-209

where the expert used law enforcement reports as a foundation for his expert opinion. The expert mentioned the reports as foundational documents but did not testify as to the specific contents of the documents; his opinion went exclusively to the reconstruction of the accident and he did not testify as to negligence. McGuire v. Solis, 2005 WY 129, 120 P.3d 1020,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2005).

Stated

in

Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of police officer's testimony at state trial relating to motorist's admissions made in or for automobile accident report required by law, 46 ALR4th 291.

§ 31-9-210.
Transfer of registration after suspension.

If an owner’s registration has been suspended under this act, the registration shall not be transferred nor the motor vehicle in respect of which registration was issued registered in any other name until the division is satisfied that the transfer of registration is proposed in good faith and not for the purpose or with the effect of defeating the purposes of this act. Nothing in this section shall be held to apply to or affect the registration of any motor vehicle sold by a person who, pursuant to the terms or conditions of any written instrument giving a right of repossession, has exercised the right and has repossessed the motor vehicle from a person whose registration has been suspended under this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 30; C.S. 1945, § 60-1530; W.S. 1957, § 31-296; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).